pt-PT: Modelo Fin: Acelerador; Carver; Drive; Keel; Neutro; Pivot; Rake; Reator; Controlo de velocidade; Geração de velocidade; Outro
bg-BG: Шаблон на перката: Акселератор; Карвър; Драйв; Кил; Неутрален; Пивот; Рейк; Реактор; Контрол на скоростта; Генериране на скорост; Други
sv: Fenans mall/profil: Accelerator; Carver; Drive; Keel; Neutral; Pivot; Rake; Reactor; Hastighetskontroll; Hastighetsgenererande; Övrigt
it: Fin nero: Accelerator; Carver; Drive; Keel; Neutro; Pivot; Rake; Reactor; Speed Control; Speed Generating; Altro
hr-HR: Predložak peraja: Accelerator; Carver; Drive; Keel; Neutralno; Pivot; Rake; Reactor; Speed Control; Speed Generating; Ostalo
da: Finneskabelon: Accelerator; Carver; Drive; Keel; Neutral; Pivot; Rake; Reactor; Speed control; Speed generating; Andet
ro-RO: Șablon aripioare: Accelerator; Carver; Drive; Carenă; Neutral; Pivot; Rake (Înclinație); Reactor; Speed Control; Speed Generating; Altele
nb: Fin mal: Akselerator; Carver; Drive; Kjøl; Nøytral; Pivot; Rake; Reactor; Fartskontroll; Fartsgenererende; Annet
ko: 핀 템플릿: 액셀러레이터; 카버; 드라이브; 킬; 뉴트럴; 피벗; 레이크; 리액터; 스피드 컨트롤; 스피드 제너레이팅; 기타
es: Plantilla de aleta: Acelerador; Carver; Impulso; Keel; Neutral; Pivote; Rake; Reactor; Control de velocidad; Generación de velocidad; Otro
tr: Fin şablonu: Hızlandırıcı; Oymacı; Sürüş; Salma; Nötr; Pivot; Eğimli; Reaktör; Hız Kontrolü; Hız Üretici; Diğer
pl: Fin szablon: Accelerator; Carver; Drive; Keel; Neutral; Pivot; Rake; Reactor; Kontrola prędkości; Generowanie prędkości; Inny
pt-BR: Modelo da quilha: Accelerator; Carver; Drive; Keel; Neutro; Pivot; Rake; Reactor; Controle de velocidade; Geração de velocidade; Outros
th: ฟิน ทิชชู่: Accelerator; Carver; Drive; Keel; ปานกลาง; Pivot; Rake; Reactor; ควบคุมความเร็ว; สร้างความเร็ว; อื่นๆ
vi: Mẫu vây: Tăng tốc; Rẽ sóng; Tạo đà; Keel; Trung lập; Xoay trục; Nghiêng; Phản xạ; Kiểm soát tốc độ; Tạo tốc độ; Khác
zh-CN: 鳍片模板: 加速型; 转向型; 驱动型; 龙骨型; 中性; 枢轴型; 倾角型; 反应型; 速度控制型; 速度生成型; 其他
lt-LT: Peleko šablonas: „Accelerator“; „Carver“; „Drive“; Kilis („Keel“); Neutralus; „Pivot“; „Rake“; „Reactor“; „Speed Control“; „Speed Generating“; Kita
de: Flossenvorlage: Accelerator; Carver; Drive; Kiel; Neutral; Pivot; Rake; Reactor; Speed Control; Speed Generating; Sonstige
nl: Vin sjabloon: Accelerator; Carver; Drive; Kiel; Neutraal; Pivot; Rake; Reactor; Snelheidscontrole; Snelheidsgenererend; Overige
sk-SK: Šablóna plutiev: Accelerator; Carver; Drive; Keel; Neutrálna; Pivot; Rake; Reactor; Speed Control; Speed Generating; Iné
el: Πρότυπο πτερυγίου: Επιτάχυνση (Accelerator); Carver; Drive; Καρίνα (Keel); Ουδέτερο; Pivot; Rake; Reactor; Έλεγχος ταχύτητας; Παραγωγή ταχύτητας; Άλλο
ru: Шаблон плавника: Акселератор; Карвер; Драйв; Киль; Нейтральный; Пивот; Рейк; Реактор; Контроль скорости; Генерация скорости; Другое
zh-TW: 鰭片輪廓: 加速型; 轉向型; 驅動型; 龍骨型; 均衡型; 軸心型; 傾角型; 反應型; 速度控制型; 產速型; 其他
ja: フィンテンプレート: アクセラレーター; カーバー; ドライブ; キール; ニュートラル; ピボット; レイク; リアクター; スピードコントロール; スピードジェネレーティング; その他
en: Fin template: Accelerator; Carver; Drive; Keel; Neutral; Pivot; Rake; Reactor; Speed Control; Speed Generating; Other
fr: Gabarit de l’aileron: Accélérateur; Carver; Drive; Keel; Neutre; Pivot; Rake; Reactor; Contrôle de vitesse; Génération de vitesse; Autre
cs: Vzor ploutvičky: Accelerator; Carver; Drive; Kýlová; Neutrální; Pivot; Rake; Reactor; Kontrola rychlosti; Generování rychlosti; Jiné
sl-SI: Šablona smernika: Accelerator; Carver; Drive; Keel; Neutral; Pivot; Rake; Reactor; Speed Control; Speed Generating; Drugo
hu: Uszonysablon: Accelerator; Carver; Meghajtó; Gerinc; Semleges; Pivot; Rake; Reactor; Sebességkontroll; Sebességgeneráló; Egyéb
fi: Räpylän malli: Accelerator; Carver; Drive; Köli; Neutraali; Pivot; Rake; Reactor; Nopeudenhallinta; Nopeudentuotto; Muu